District of Columbia statutes.
19-1501

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act”.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

For prior codification of Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests: See § 21-2091 et seq.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).